dictsource/cv_rules
.L01 и ӳ ы у ĕ ӑ е а // vowels

.group а
       а       a
.group ӑ
       ӑ       @
.group б
       б       b
.group в
       в       v#
.group г
       г       g
.group д
       д       d
.group е
       е       E
.group ё
       ё       jo
.group ӗ
       ӗ       @.  // close-mid central unrounded vowel, can't find the symbol
.group ж
       ж       z.
.group з
       з       z
.group и
       и       i
.group й
       й       j
.group к
       к       k
  L01) к (L01  g
.group л
       л       l
.group м
       м       m
.group н
       н       n
.group о
       о       o
.group п
       п       p
  L01) п (L01  b
.group р
       р       R
.group с
       с       s
  L01) с (L01  z
.group ҫ
       ҫ       S.
  L01) ҫ (L01  Z.
.group т
       т       t
  L01) т (L01  d
.group у
       у       u
.group ӳ
       ӳ       y
.group ф
       ф       f
.group х
       х       X
  L01) х (L01  Q
.group ц
       ц       ts
  L01) ц (L01  dz
.group ч
       ч       tS.
  L01) ч (L01  dZ.
.group ш
       ш       s.
  L01) ш (L01  z.
.group щ
       щ       S.S.
.group ъ
       ъ
.group ы
       ы       u-
.group ь
       ь
.group э
       э       e
.group ю
       ю       ju
.group я
       я       ja
